Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB950.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1105.1. Premium Rate Increases.--(a) The premium charged to an insured under a long-term care insurance policy may not increase due to either:(1) the increasing age of the insured; or(2) the duration the insured has been covered under the policy.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (b) An insurer may not charge a renewal premium rate for a long-term care insurance policy by an increase greater than fifteen per centum (15%) of any premium charged for the policy during the preceding twelve months.(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), the commissioner shall disapprove a premium rate increase under this section if:(1) the benefits provided are not reasonable in relation to the premium charged;(2) the proposed premium rate is excessive, unjustified or unfairly discriminatory; or(3) for a given policy form, the premium rate applicable to any particular policy issued on the policy form is increased by an amount exceeding an annual rate cap of fifteen per centum (15%).(d) With approval of the commissioner, an insurer may increase a renewal premium greater than fifteen per centum (15%) upon a showing that a larger increase is necessary because of utilization of policy benefits in excess of the expected rate.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0950PN0976 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819